Utah statutes.
58-60-406.   Qualifications for admission to examination.
All applicants for admission to any examination qualifying an individual for
licensure under this part shall:
(1)  submit an application on a form provided by the division;
(2)  pay the fee established by division rule for the examination; and
(3)  certify under penalty of perjury as evidenced by notarized signature on
the application for admission to the examination that the applicant has
completed the education requirement and been awarded the earned degree
required for licensure.
